Utah statutes.
53A-12-201.   State policy on providing textbooks.
(1)  It is the public policy of this state that public education shall be
free.
(2)  A student may not be denied an education because of economic inability to
purchase textbooks necessary for advancement in or graduation from the public
school system.
(3)  A school board may not sell textbooks or otherwise charge textbook fees
or deposits except as provided in Title 53A.
